Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5390.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings.
The general assembly finds as follows:
(1) Over 42,000 victims of crime receive lifesaving services from Rhode Island victim
services organizations each year;
(2) These victim service organizations support some of the most vulnerable populations in
Rhode Island, including minor victims of child abuse, sexual assault survivors, elder abuse victims,
domestic violence victims, and survivors of human trafficking, community violence, and gun
violence;
(3) Federal funds allocated to Rhode Island for victim services have been sharply reduced
by nearly forty percent (40%) for FY2025, threatening the safety and recovery of crime victims;
(4) These victim service organizations provide services to crime survivors in crisis,
education programs, and advocacy and prevention efforts to better support victims and
communities affected by many different forms of violence;
(5) These victim services organizations envision a society where violence is not tolerated
because communities are enlightened and responsive to the needs of victims and their children,
focusing on policy, prevention, survivor activism, communications, and training to achieve this
critical goal;
(6) These victim service organizations provide a wide array of services for victims of crime,

including a 24/7 statewide Victims’ of Crime Helpline and individual agency hotlines, support
victims at crime scenes and immediately after, referrals for crime victim’s financial compensation,
restraining order advocacy, emergency shelter and housing, support for group or individual
counseling services, child advocacy services, assistance with pending court processes, assistance
with civil legal services, and more;
(7) The work of victim service organizations helps victims heal, reintegrate into society,
and break the cycle of abuse. This work not only aids in their recovery, but also reduces future state
costs, including emergency room visits, mental health services, shelter expenses, and potential
criminal activity. In addition, investing in victim services fosters healthier, more economically
stable communities by enabling survivors to return to work and reducing dependency on public
assistance programs;
(8) Rhode Island has thus far invested only minimal state funds to support these life-saving
programs that break the cycle of violence;
(9) This grant funding will fill the significant gap in current funding, thereby allowing these
essential victim services organizations to fulfill their missions to aid and support victims of violent
crime in the state.
SECTION 2. Chapter 42-7.3 of the General Laws entitled "Department of Public Safety"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-7.3-11. Victims of crime trauma informed mobilization grant fund.
(a) The department of public safety is hereby directed to create the victims of crime trauma
informed mobilization fund or the VICTIM Fund. This fund will support a competitive grant
program aimed at assisting nonprofit organizations in Rhode Island that work with victims of crime
(“victim service organizations”).
(1) VICTIM fund grants will be allocated to Rhode Island nonprofit (501(c)(3))
organizations with annual budgets under fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) that are actively
providing victim service programs.
(2) These victim service organizations shall be victim advocacy and/or direct service
organizations. Municipalities and state agencies shall not receive these grant funds.
(3) Funds from these grants shall supplement and not supplant other funds granted to victim
service organizations.
(4) Priority consideration shall be given to organizations proposing innovative service
delivery methods, culturally specific programs, or strategies to address underserved populations.
(b) In order to ensure that victim services organizations receive timely funding to address
immediate needs and maintain uninterrupted support for victims, VICTIM fund grants shall be
LC000958 - Page 2 of 4

allocated to victim service organizations by January of the fiscal year in which they were
appropriated and not carried over into a future fiscal year.
(c) For each fiscal year, beginning in fiscal year 2026, the general assembly shall make an
appropriation by separate line item in the budget of at least thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) to
fund the VICTIM Fund.
(1) The thirty million-dollar ($30,000,000) allocation shall only be used for grants to non-
profit organizations as described in this section. The appropriation to the department of public
safety shall be adjusted as necessary to meet the needs of the program on an on-going basis, without
disruption.
(2) The department of public safety shall provide the general assembly with an annual
report in December of each year, detailing how and to whom the grant funds were allocated and
any outcomes associated with the funding.
(d) In addition to funding grants to victim service organizations as outlined in this section,
the general assembly shall include a separate line-item appropriation in the budget each fiscal year
to cover the cost of one or more full-time equivalent positions at the department of public safety to
assist in the administration and implementation of the VICTIM Fund grant program.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
========
LC000958
========
LC000958 - Page 3 of 4